Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-2545
Payments to employees; methods authorized.

The county board of each
county in this state may authorize payments that include, but are not limited
to, salary and reimbursable expenses to any employee by electronic funds transfer
or a similar means of direct deposit.

Laws 2011, LB278, § 2.